Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201820-149
Consumer reporting agency; furnish information; duty; violation; penalty.

Any consumer reporting agency doing business in this state which is required to furnish information to a consumer, protected consumer as defined in section 8-2602, or representative as defined in section 8-2602 pursuant to 15 U.S.C. 1681g to 1681j as such sections existed on January 1, 2016, shall, upon the request of such consumer, protected consumer, or representative and at a reasonable charge, provide such consumer, protected consumer, or representative with a typewritten or photostatic copy of any consumer report, investigative report, or any credit report or other file information which it has on file or has prepared concerning such consumer or protected consumer, if such consumer, protected consumer, or representative has complied with 15 U.S.C. 1681h as such section existed on January 1, 2016. If such report uses a code to convey information about such consumer or protected consumer, such consumer, protected consumer, or representative shall be provided with a key to such code. For the purposes of this section, the definitions found in 15 U.S.C. 1681a as such section existed on January 1, 2016, shall apply. Any person violating this section shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1983, LB 197, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB835, § 21.

Credit Report Protection Act, see section 8-2601.